en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Arts & Crafts > Art & Crafting Materials > Olfactory Arts Materials > Candle Making Materials > Raw Candle Wax: Beeswax; Coconut Wax; Gel Wax; Palm Wax; Paraffin; Rapeseed & Canola Wax; Soy Wax
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Kunst og håndverk > Kunst- og håndverksmaterialer > Materialer for duftkunst > Materialer for produksjon av stearinlys > Rå lysvoks: Bivoks; Kokosvoks; Gelvoks; Palmevoks; Parafin; Raps- og canolavoks; Soyavoks
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Håndarbejde og hobby > Materialer til håndarbejde og hobby > Materialer til olfaktorisk kunst > Materialer til fremstilling af stearinlys > Uforarbejdet voks til fremstilling af lys: Bivoks; Kokosvoks; Gelvoks; Palmevoks; Paraffin; Rapsvoks; Sojavoks
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Artes e trabalhos manuais > Materiais para artes e trabalhos manuais > Materiais de artes olfativas > Materiais para fazer velas > Cera para velas: Cera de abelha; Cera de coco; Cera em gel; Cera de palma; Parafina; Cera de colza e canola; Cera de soja
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Manualidades > Materiales para manualidades > Materiales para las artes olfativas > Materiales para hacer velas > Cera virgen para velas: Cera de abejas; Cera de coco; Cera en gel; Cera de palma; Parafina; Cera de colza y canola; Cera de soja
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 미술/공예 > 미술/공예 재료 > 후각 예술 재료 > 양초 제조 재료 > 미가공 양초 왁스: 밀랍; 코코넛 왁스; 젤왁스; 팜왁스; 파라핀; 유채씨 및 카놀라 왁스; 소이왁스
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Menai ir amatai > Menų ir amatų medžiagos > Uoslės lavinimo medžiagos > Žvakių gamybos medžiagos > Neapdorotas žvakių vaškas: Bičių vaškas; Kokosų vaškas; Gelinis vaškas; Palmių vaškas; Parafinas; Rapsų vaškas; Sojų vaškas
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Taide ja askartelu > Askartelumateriaalit > Hajuaistia hyödyntävän taiteen materiaalit > Kynttilän valmistusmateriaalit > Steariini: Mehiläisvaha; Kookosvaha; Geelivaha; Palmuvaha; Parafiini; Rypsi- ja rapsivaha; Soijavaha
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Đồ thủ công mỹ nghệ > Vật liệu nghệ thuật & thủ công mỹ nghệ > Vật liệu chế tác hương thơm > Vật liệu làm nến > Sáp nến thô: Sáp ong; Sáp dừa; Sáp gel; Sáp cọ; Sáp paraffin; Sáp hạt cải và hạt cải dầu; Sáp đậu nành
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Artigianato e hobby > Materiali per hobby e artigianato > Materiali per le arti olfattive > Materiali per la creazione di candele > Cera grezza per candele: Cera d'api; Cera di cocco; Cera gel; Cera di palma; Paraffina; Cera di colza e canola; Cera di soia
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Művészet és barkácsolás > Művészeti és kézműves anyagok > Illatművészeti anyagok > Gyertyakészítési anyagok > Nyers gyertyaviasz: Méhviasz; Kókuszviasz; Gélviasz; Pálmaviasz; Paraffin; Repceviasz; Szójaviasz
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Výtvarná dielňa > Materiály pre výtvarnú dielňu > Materiály pre čuchové umenie > Materiály na výrobu sviečok > Surový vosk na sviečky: Včelí vosk; Kokosový vosk; Gélový vosk; Palmový vosk; Parafín; Repkový a kanolový vosk; Sójový vosk
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > クラフト・アート > アート・クラフト用素材 > 嗅覚アート材料 > キャンドル製作材料 > キャンドル用ワックス: 蜜蝋; ココナッツワックス; ジェルワックス; パームワックス; パラフィン; 菜種・キャノーラワックス; ソイワックス
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Изкуства и творчество > Творчески материали > Материали за създаване на аромати > Материали за правене на свещи > Суров восък за свещи: Пчелен восък; Кокосов восък; Гел восък; Палмов восък; Парафин; Восък от рапица и канола; Соев восък
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Τέχνες & Χειροτεχνίες > Υλικά τέχνης & χειροτεχνίας > Υλικά οσφρητικής τέχνης > Υλικά κηροπλαστικής > Ακατέργαστο κερί για κεριά: Κερί μέλισσας; Κερί καρύδας; Κερί τζελ; Κερί φοινικέλαιου; Παραφίνη; Κερί ελαιοκράμβης & κανόλας; Κερί σόγιας
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Sanatlar ve El İşleri > Sanat ve El İşleri Malzemeleri > Koku Sanatı Malzemeleri > Mum Yapım Malzemeleri > Ham Mum Parafini: Bal Mumu; Hindistan cevizi mumu; Jel Mum; Palmiye Mumu; Parafin; Kolza ve kanola mumu; Soya Mumu
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Arte e artesanato > Materiais de arte e de artesanato > Materiais para artes olfativas > Materiais para fazer velas > Ceras naturais para vela: Cera de abelha; Cera de coco; Cera em gel; Cera de palma; Parafina; Cera de colza e canola; Cera de soja
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Sztuka i rękodzieło > Materiały dla artystów i rękodzielników > Materiały do tworzenia zapachów > Materiały do wyrobu świec > Surowy wosk na świece: Wosk pszczeli; Wosk kokosowy; Wosk w żelu; Wosk palmowy; Parafina; Wosk rzepakowy; Wosk sojowy
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Artizanat > Materiale pentru artă/artizanat > Materiale pentru arte olfactive > Materiale pentru crearea de lumânări > Ceară brută pentru lumânări: Ceară de albine; Ceară de cocos; Ceară tip gel; Ceară de palmier; Parafină; Ceară de rapiță și canola; Ceară de soia
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Řemesla a koníčky > Materiál pro umění a řemesla > Materiály pro čichové umění > Materiály na výrobu svíček > Vosk na výrobu svíček: Včelí vosk; Kokosový vosk; Gelový vosk; Palmový vosk; Parafín; Řepkový vosk; Sojový vosk
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Umetnost in ročna dela > Materiali za umetniško ustvarjanje in ročna dela > Materiali za olfaktorno umetnost > Materiali za svečarstvo > Surovi vosek za sveče: Čebelji vosek; Kokosov vosek; Gel vosek; Palmov vosek; Parafin; Repični in kanolin vosek; Sojin vosek
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Kunsthandwerk & Hobby > Kunst- & Bastelmaterialien > Materialien zur Duftherstellung > Materialien zur Kerzenherstellung > Rohes Kerzenwachs: Bienenwachs; Kokoswachs; Gelwachs; Palmwachs; Paraffin; Raps- & Canolawachs; Sojawachs
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > ศิลปะและงานฝีมือ > วัสดุงานศิลปะและงานฝีมือ > วัสดุศิลปะการดมกลิ่น > วัสดุอุปกรณ์ทำเทียน > แวกซ์เทียนดิบ: ขี้ผึ้ง; แว็กซ์มะพร้าว; ไขเจล; ไขปาล์ม; พาราฟิน; แว็กซ์เรปซีดและคาโนลา; ไขถั่วเหลือง
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 手工艺品 > 手工艺材料 > 嗅觉艺术材料 > 蜡烛制作材料 > 未加工烛用蜡: 蜂蜡; 椰子蜡; 胶蜡; 棕榈蜡; 石蜡; 油菜籽和芥花籽蜡; 大豆蜡
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 藝術品和手工藝品 > 藝術/手作材料 > 嗅覺藝術材料 > 蠟燭製作材料 > 燭用蠟: 蜂蠟; 椰子蠟; 果凍蠟; 棕櫚蠟; 石蠟; 菜籽與芥花蠟; 大豆蠟
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Hantverk och hobbyer > Hobbymaterial > Olfaktoriska hobbymaterial > Ljusstöpningsmaterial > Råvax: Bivax; Kokosvax; Gelvax; Palmvax; Paraffin; Rapsvax; Sojavax
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Umjetnost i rukotvorine > Materijali za umjetnost i rukotvorine > Materijali za olfaktornu umjetnost > Materijali za izradu svijeća > Sirovi vosak za svijeće: Pčelinji vosak; Kokosov vosak; Gel vosak; Palmin vosak; Parafin; Repičin vosak; Sojin vosak
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Loisirs créatifs > Matériaux pour loisirs créatifs > Matériaux pour les arts olfactifs > Matériaux pour la fabrication de bougies > Cire brute: Cire d’abeille; Cire de coco; Cire gel; Cire de palme; Paraffine; Cire de colza et de canola; Cire de soja
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Искусство и рукоделие > Материалы для художественных работ и рукоделия > Материалы для ольфакторного искусства > Материалы для изготовления свечей > Воск для свечей: Пчелиный воск; Кокосовый воск; Свечной гель; Пальмовый воск; Парафин; Воск из рапса и канолы; Соевый воск
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Handwerk en hobby's > Handwerk- en hobbymaterialen > Materialen voor geurkunsten > Materialen voor het maken van kaarsen > Pure kaarsenwas: Bijenwas; Kokoswas; Gelwas; Palmwas; Paraffine; Koolzaad- en canolawas; Sojawas